Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 8 Memorial Hospitals

Cross references. —

For duty of county to provide and maintain necessary county buildings, see §

18-2-103

.

For authority of county hospital to issue certificates of indebtedness, see §

18-4-104

.

For constitutional provision as to the establishment of charitable and penal institutions under the supervision of the state board of charities and reform, see art. 7, § 18, Wyo. Const.

As to bringing drugs or intoxicating liquors into hospitals, etc., see §

6-5-208

.

As to bringing weapons or explosives into institutions, etc., see §

6-5-209

.

As to hospitals and related institutions generally, see §§

35-2-113

through

35-2-912

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Hospital's liability for injury resulting from failure to have sufficient number of nurses on duty, 2 ALR5th 286.

Liability of hospital, physician, or other medical personnel for death or injury to child caused by improper postdelivery diagnosis, care, and representations, 2 ALR5th 811.